Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1787
Purpose and conditions of loans.

Subject to the restrictions contained in the Credit Union Act, a credit union may make loans to its members for provident or productive purposes upon such terms and conditions and upon such security, real or personal, or on an unsecured basis as prescribed in its bylaws or written lending policy.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 87.